Utah statutes.
72-7-303.   Escaping water and other obstructions -- Injuring or obstructing highway -- Penalty for violations.

(1)  A person may not willfully or carelessly:

(a)  obstruct or damage any public highway by causing or permitting flow or seepage of water;

(b)  permit water under the person's control to escape in any manner that results in damage to a public highway;

(c)  place or leave, or cause to be placed or left, anything upon a public highway in a way that obstructs travel or that endangers property or persons passing on the highway.

(2)  A person who violates this section is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 270, 1998 General Session

